Utah statutes.
78B-5-811.   Provisions as to depositions made applicable to nonjudicial proceedings.

The provisions of law relating to the taking of depositions in actions pending before the courts of this state are applicable to commissions, boards and officers authorized to subpoena witnesses and take testimony.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

